Vermont, session 2025-2026, S22.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 4004a is added to read:
§ 4004a. FIREARM DISCHARGE WITHIN 500 FEET OF CHILD CARE
FACILITY OR SCHOOL PROPERTY
(a) A person shall not knowingly discharge a firearm within 500 feet of:
(1) school property; or
(2) a child care facility that the person knows or reasonably should
know is open for business at the time of the discharge.
(b) A person who violates this section shall be imprisoned not more than
one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.
VT LEG #379680 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.22
2025 Page 2 of 2
(c) This section shall not apply to the discharge of a firearm for legitimate
law enforcement purposes by a federal law enforcement officer or a law
enforcement officer certified as a law enforcement officer by the Vermont
Criminal Justice Council pursuant to 20 V.S.A. § 2358.
(d) As used in this section:
(1) “Child care facility” means:
(A) a child care facility as defined in 33 V.S.A. § 511; or
(B) a prequalified private prekindergarten provider as defined in
16 V.S.A. § 829.
(2) “Firearm” has the same meaning as in section 4016 of this title.
(3) “Owned by the school” means owned, leased, controlled, or
subcontracted by the school.
(4) “School property” means any property owned by a school.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379680 v.1